FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.4/english/FST/src/lex-more.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Additional lexicon entries
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 12-Apr-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [0]: old analyzer
!# [1]: file professions.xfst
!# [2]: file pers_names.xfst
!# [3]: file titles.xfst
!# [4]: file additions.xfst
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Title		! title
+Month		! month name

+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym


! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PLX		! plural place marker
^PlE		! plura +es

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;


LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
!LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
!LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
!LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

!LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
!LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
!LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# nouns and adjectives

LEXICON NOUN/SG		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG;
LEXICON NOUN/PL		< %+Noun:0 >			N/PL;
LEXICON NOUN		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG+PLs;
!LEXICON NOUNINV		< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		optGENSG;

!LEXICON ADJ		< %+Adj:0 >			#;

! noun or adjective
!LEXICON NADJ		< %+NAdj:0 %+Sg:0 >		#;
!			< %+Noun:0 %+Sg:0 >		GENSG;
!			< %+Noun:0 %+Pl:{+s} >		optGENPL;
!LEXICON NADJINV		< %+NAdj:0 %+SP:0 >		#;
!			< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		GENSG;

! possible replacement:
! LEXICON NADJ		ADJ; NOUN;
! LEXICON NADJINV	ADJ; NOUNINV;


!# special words
LEXICON TITLE/SG	< %+Title:0 >			N/SG;
LEXICON TITLE/PL	< %+Title:0 >			N/PL;
LEXICON TITLE		< %+Title:0 >			N/SG+PLs;	
LEXICON TITLE/POST	< %+Title:0 %+Postmod:0 >	#;

LEXICON ROOT
January+Month				PROP;
January+Month+Abbr:Jan^DOT		PROP/SG;
February+Month				PROP;
February+Month+Abbr:Feb^DOT		PROP/SG;
March+Month				PROP;
March+Month+Abbr:Mar^DOT		PROP/SG;
April+Month				PROP;
April+Month+Abbr:Apr^DOT		PROP/SG;
May+Month				PROP;
June+Month				PROP;
June+Month+Abbr:Jun^DOT			PROP/SG;
July+Month				PROP;
July+Month+Abbr:Jul^DOT			PROP/SG;
August+Month				PROP;
August+Month+Abbr:Aug^DOT		PROP/SG;
September+Month				PROP;
September+Month+Abbr:Sep^DOT		PROP/SG;
September+Month+Abbr:Sept^DOT		PROP/SG;
October+Month				PROP;
October+Month+Abbr:Oct^DOT		PROP/SG;
November+Month				PROP;
November+Month+Abbr:Nov^DOT		PROP/SG;
December+Month				PROP;
December+Month+Abbr:Dec^DOT		PROP/SG;
Monday+Day				PROP;
Monday+Day+Abbr:Mon^DOT			PROP/SG;
Tuesday+Day				PROP;
Tuesday+Day+Abbr:Tue^DOT		PROP/SG;
Tuesday+Day+Abbr:Tues^DOT		PROP/SG;
Wednesday+Day				PROP;
Wednesday+Day+Abbr:Wed^DOT		PROP/SG;
Thursday+Day				PROP;
Thursday+Day+Abbr:Thu^DOT		PROP/SG;
Thursday+Day+Abbr:Thur^DOT		PROP/SG;
Thursday+Day+Abbr:Thurs^DOT		PROP/SG;
Friday+Day				PROP;
Friday+Day+Abbr:Fri^DOT			PROP/SG;
Saturday+Day				PROP;
Saturday+Day+Abbr:Sat^DOT		PROP/SG;
Sunday+Day				PROP;
Sunday+Day+Abbr:Sun^DOT			PROP/SG;
Palais% des% Festivals			PROP/SG;	!	[4]
Eau% de% Cologne			PROP/SG;	!	[4]
Fahrenheit% 9/11			PROP/SG;	!	[4]
grand-aunt				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-child				NOUN/SG;	!	[2]
grand-child:grand-children		NOUN/PL;	!	[2]
grand-daughter				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-father				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-mother				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-parent				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-son				NOUN;		!	[2]
grand-uncle				NOUN;		!	[2]
air% traffic% controller		NOUN;		!	[1]
animal% trainer				NOUN;		!	[1]
antique% dealer				NOUN; 		!	[1]
attorney^PLX% at% law			NOUN;		!	[1]
bar% keeper				NOUN; 		!	[1]
cab% driver				NOUN; 		!	[1]
cabinet-maker				NOUN; 		!	[1]
chimney-sweeper				NOUN; 		!	[1]
computer% programmer			NOUN; 		!	[1]
construction% worker			NOUN; 		!	[1]
corporate% executive% officer		NOUN;		!	[1]
court% jester				NOUN; 		!	[1]
customs% officer			NOUN; 		!	[1]
dietician				NOUN; 		!	[1]
dock% labourer				NOUN; 		!	[1]
engine% driver				NOUN;		!	[1]
estate% agent				NOUN; 		!	[1]
ferryman^MAN				NOUN;		!	[1]
fire% officer				NOUN; 		!	[1]
flight% instructor			NOUN; 		!	[1]
garbage% collector			NOUN; 		!	[1]
mechanician				NOUN; 		!	[1]
odontologist				NOUN;		!	[1]
pedologist				NOUN; 		!	[1]
pop% star				NOUN;		!	[1]
proceedings				NOUN/PL;
proceedings+Abbr:proc.			NOUN/PL;
real% estate% agent			NOUN; 		!	[1]
secretary^PLX% general			NOUN;		!	[1]
security% guard				NOUN; 		!	[1]
software% engineer			NOUN; 		!	[1]
special% agent				NOUN; 		!	[1]
street% vendor				NOUN; 		!	[1]
stuntman^MAN				NOUN;		!	[1]
telephone% operator			NOUN;    	!	[1]
Admiral^PLX% of% the% Fleet		TITLE;		!	[3]
Air% Commodore				TITLE;		!	[3]
Air% Vice-Marshal			TITLE;		!	[3]
Airman^MAN^PLX% 1st% Class		TITLE;		!
Airman^MAN^PLX% First% Class		TITLE;		!	[3]
Ambassador				TITLE;		!	[3]
Archdeacon				TITLE;		!	[3]
Ayatollah				TITLE;		!	[3]
Baron					TITLE;		!	[3]
Baronet					TITLE;		!	[3]
Bey					TITLE;		!	[3]
Brigadier				TITLE;		!	[3]
Brother					TITLE;		!	[0]
Captain					TITLE;		!	[0]
Captain+Abbr:Capt^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
CEO+Abbr				TITLE;		!	[0]
chan					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Chaplain				TITLE;		!	[0]
Chief					TITLE;		!	[0]
Chief% Master% Sergeant^PLX% of% the% Air% Force	TITLE;	!	[3]
Coach					TITLE;		!	[0]
Colonel+Abbr:Col^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Command% Master				TITLE;		!	[3]
Commander				TITLE;		!	[0]
Commander+Abbr:Cdr^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Commander+Abbr:Cmdr^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Commander+Abbr:Comdr^DOT		TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Commissioner				TITLE;		!	[3]
Corporal				TITLE;		!	[0]
Count% palatine				TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Countess				TITLE;		!	[3]
Dictator				TITLE;		!	[3]
Director+Abbr:Dir^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Director+Abbr:Dirs^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Doctor+Abbr:Dr^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Doctors+Abbr:Drs^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Duke					TITLE;		!	[0]
Emir					TITLE;		!	[3]
Empress					TITLE;		!	[3]
Esquire+Abbr:Esq^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Führer					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Father+Abbr:Fr^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Field% Marshal				TITLE;		!	[3]
First% Sergeant				TITLE;		!	[3]
Flying% Officer				TITLE;		!	[3]
Fräulein				TITLE/SG;	!
Frau					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Gauleiter				TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
General					TITLE;		!	[0]
General+Abbr:Gen^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Governor				TITLE;		!	[0]
Governor+Abbr:Gov^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Grand% Duke				TITLE;		!	[3]
Her% Highness				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Her% Honor				TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Her% Majesty				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Her% Royal% Highness			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Herr					TITLE/SG;
High% Commissioner			TITLE;		!	[3]
His% Highness				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
His% Honor				TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
His% Majesty				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
His% Royal% Highness			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Honorable+Abbr:Hon^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Inspector				TITLE;		!	[0]
Inspector+Abbr:Ins^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Junior					TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Junior+Abbr:Jnr^DOT			TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Junior+Abbr:Jr^DOT			TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Kaiser					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Knez					TITLE;		!	[3]
kun					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Landgrave				TITLE;		!	[3]
Lieutenant% Commander			TITLE;		!	[3]
Lieutenant+Abbr:lt^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Lieutenant+Abbr:Lt^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Lieutenant^PLX% Senior% Grade		TITLE;		!	[3]
M+Abbr					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
M.M.+Abbr				TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Madam+Abbr:Mdm^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Madame					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
madame					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Madame+Abbr:MME				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Madame+Abbr:Mme^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Madame:Mesdames				TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
madame:mesdames				TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Madames+Abbr:Mmes^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Mademoiselle				TITLE;		!	[0]
Mademoiselle+Abbr:Mlle^DOT		TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Mademoiselle+Abbr:Mlles^DOT		TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Mademoiselle:Mesdemoiselles		TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
mademoiselle:mesdemoiselles		TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Majesty					TITLE;		!	[0]
Major+Abbr:Maj^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Marchioness				TITLE;		!	[3]
Master					TITLE;		!	[0]
Master% Sergeant			TITLE;		!	[3]
Minister				TITLE;		!	[0]
Mistah					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Mister+Abbr:Messrs^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Mister+Abbr:Mr^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Mistress+Abbr:Mrs^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Monseigneur				TITLE;
Monsieur+Abbr:MM^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Monsieur:Messieurs			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Ms+Abbr:Ms^DOT				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Ms+Abbr:Mses^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Notary					TITLE;		!	[3]
Patriarch				TITLE;		!	[3]
PFC+Abbr				TITLE;		!	[0]
PhD+Abbr				TITLE/POST;	!	[3]
Pontiff					TITLE;		!	[3]
Presbyter				TITLE;		!	[3]
President+Abbr:Pres^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Prime% Minister				TITLE;		!	[3]
Private+Abbr:Pvt^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Private^PLX% 1st% Class			TITLE;		!	[3]
Professor+Abbr:Prof^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Queen's% Counsel			TITLE;		!	[3]
Rear% Admiral				TITLE;		!	[3]
Representative+Abbr:Rep^DOT		TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Representative+Abbr:Reps^DOT		TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Retired+Abbr:Ret^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Reverend				TITLE;		!	[0]
Reverend+Abbr:Rev^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Reverend+Abbr:Revd^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Saint+Abbr:St^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Sainte+Abbr:Ste^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
sama					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
san					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Seaman% Apprentice			TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Seaman% Recruit				TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Second% Lieutenant			TITLE;		!	[3]
Secretary+Abbr:Secy^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Seigneur				TITLE;		!	[3]
Senator+Abbr:Sen^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Senator+Abbr:Sens^DOT			TITLE/PL;	!	[0]
Senior					TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Senior% Master% Sergeant		TITLE;		!	[3]
Senior+Abbr:Snr^DOT			TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Senior+Abbr:Sr^DOT			TITLE/POST;	!	[0]
Senora+Abbr:Sra^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Senorita+Abbr:Srta^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
sensei					TITLE/SG;	!	[3]
Sergeant				TITLE;		!	[0]
Sergeant+Abbr:Sgt^DOT			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Sergeant^PLX% 1st% Class		TITLE;		!
Shaman					TITLE;		!	[3]
Signor					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Signora					TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Specialist^PLX% Fourth% Class		TITLE;		!	[3]
Sultan					TITLE;		!	[3]
Superintendent+Abbr:Supt^DOT		TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Swami					TITLE;		!	[3]
Undersecretary				TITLE;		!	[0]
Vicereine				TITLE;		!	[3]
Your% Highness				TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
Your% Royal% Highness			TITLE/SG;	!	[0]
